North Carolina, session 2025, HB120.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services, the sum of two million
seventy-three thousand eight hundred forty-seven dollars ($2,073,847) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of two million seventy-three thousand eight hundred
forty-seven dollars ($2,073,847) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to expand the
Project Caregiver Alternatives to Running on Empty Program (Project C.A.R.E.), which provides
support to family caregivers of people living with Alzheimer's disease or other related dementias.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H120-v-2*